Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 25 Jails and Prisons

11-25-1.
Escape from correctional institutions.

Every prisoner who shall attempt to escape, or who shall escape, from the lawful custody of the warden of the adult correctional institutions, or from the custody of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to the provisions of §

40.1-5.3-1

, shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not more than three (3) years or be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500). However, nothing in this section shall be construed to include the offense of breaking jail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 13; P.L. 1920, ch. 1856, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 13; P.L. 1931, ch. 1791, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 244, § 1.

11-25-1.1.
Escape from municipal detention facility.

Every prisoner, detainee, or other person incarcerated or confined at the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility in the City of Central Falls who shall attempt to escape, or who shall escape, from the lawful custody of the director of the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility created under chapter 54 of title 45 shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned at the adult correctional institutions not more than three (3) years or be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500). This term shall commence at the expiration of the original term of imprisonment of the prisoner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 477, § 1.

11-25-2.
Assault or escape by a custodial unit inmate.

Every prisoner confined in any custodial unit of the adult correctional institutions or in the custody of the warden or other correctional employee while outside the confines of the institutions or in the custody of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to the provisions of §

40.1-5.3-1

, who shall assault the warden, or other correctional employee of the institution, or shall escape, or attempt to effect an escape, shall be sentenced by the court to a term of imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions for not less than one year nor more than twenty (20) years, that term to commence from the expiration of the original term of the prisoner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 14; P.L. 1936, ch. 2388, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-2

; P.L. 1979, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 56, § 1.

11-25-2.1.
Assault by a municipal detention inmate.

Every prisoner, detainee, or other person incarcerated or confined in the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility, created under chapter 54 of title 45 who shall assault the director or other detention center employees, shall be sentenced by the court to imprisonment at the adult correctional institutions, for not less than one year and no more than twenty (20) years. This term shall commence at the expiration of the original term of imprisonment of the prisoner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 477, § 1.

11-25-3.
Fatal assault by maximum custodial inmate deemed murder.

In case the warden or any under-keeper or any other officer of a maximum custodial unit is killed in any assault by a prisoner, the killing shall be deemed to be a murder.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; P.L. 1956, §

11-25-3

.

11-25-4.
Assault or escape by prisoner of medium or minimum custodial unit.

Every prisoner confined in the medium or minimum custodial unit of the adult correctional institutions or in the custody of the warden or other officer while outside the confines of the custodial unit, or in the custody of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to the provisions of §

40.1-5.3-1

who shall assault the warden or other officer of that institution, or shall escape, or attempt to effect an escape, either from those institutions or the custody of the warden or officers, or the director, including that custody which pertains to the work release program, shall be sentenced by the court to a term of imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions for not less than one year nor more than twenty (20) years. This term shall commence from the expiration of the original term of the prisoner.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 394, § 25, as enacted by P.L. 1936, ch. 2388, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 25; P.L. 1950, ch. 2467, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 58, § 1.

11-25-4.1.
Sentence for assault or escape by prisoner — Consecutive term.

The sentence for assault or escape, as prescribed in §

11-25-4

, shall run consecutively to the original term of incarceration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 145, § 1.

11-25-5.
Officer voluntarily allowing prisoner to escape.

Every jailer or other officer, who shall voluntarily suffer any prisoner in his or her custody upon conviction or upon any criminal charge to escape, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 8; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-5

.

11-25-6.
Officer negligently allowing escape.

Every jailer or other officer, who shall be convicted of negligently suffering any prisoner in his or her custody upon conviction or upon any criminal charge to escape, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 9; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-6

.

11-25-7.
Rescue of prisoner.

Every person who shall set at liberty or rescue, either by force or stratagem, any person convicted of any crime or offense or in the custody of any officer upon any criminal charge, or confined in any jail, lock-up, police station or other place of detention upon any criminal charge, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 6; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-7

.

11-25-8.
Conveyance to prisoner of instruments for escape.

Every person who shall convey to any prisoner confined upon any criminal charge or upon conviction in any prison, jail, lock-up, police station, or other place of detention, without the knowledge of the warden, jailer, or officer in charge of the prison, jail, lock-up, police station, or place of detention, any disguise, instrument, tool, weapon, or other thing which is adapted or useful to aid a prisoner in making his or her escape, shall if any prisoner escapes by means of a disguise, instrument, tool, weapon, or other thing so conveyed, be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both. If there is no escape by means of the disguise, instrument, tool, weapon, or other thing so conveyed, then the person so conveying it shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 10; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 5; P.L. 1920, ch. 1857, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-8

.

11-25-9.
Assisting inmate of correctional institutions to escape.

Every person who shall convey any tools to, or shall have any communication without lawful authority therefor or hold any conversation with any prisoner confined in the adult correctional institutions, from the outside of the institutions, or shall convey any tools or instruments to or in any way assist in the escape or attempted escape of any person from any institution under the management and control of the department of corrections, or shall harbor or assist that person, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 11; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 5; P.L 1922, ch. 2216, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-9

.

11-25-10.
Conveyance of intoxicants to prisoner.

Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed to any prisoner committed to the adult correctional institutions any wine or strong liquor, without the consent of the warden, shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-25-10

.

11-25-11.
Prisoners committed for violation of city or town ordinances.

The several cities and towns shall have the right to use the correctional institutions of the state for the confinement of persons committed under the authority of the ordinances of the cities or towns; provided, that the director of corrections shall not be liable for damages or costs in any suit which may be brought by any person or persons who may be committed to the correctional institutions under the authority of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9.

11-25-12.
Earnings of city or town prisoners.

No law of this state shall be so construed as to give any city or town a claim upon the state for the labor or services of any person committed to the correctional institutions under its authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9.

11-25-13.
Federal prisoners.

Prisoners arrested within this state under the authority of the United States or sentenced under the authority of any court under the authority of the United States held within the territorial limits of the first, second, or third judicial circuit of the United States as constituted on April 26, 1956, except Puerto Rico, shall be committed under the authority of the United States to any adult correctional institution and payment shall be made of the expense of maintaining and supervising those prisoners. The director of corrections of the adult correctional institutions shall receive the prisoners and safely keep them in the institutions until they are discharged by due course of the laws of the United States, under the like penalties and liabilities, civil and criminal, as in the case of prisoners committed by the authority of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9.

11-25-14.
Conveyance of unauthorized articles to or from institutions.

Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed into the adult correctional institutions any article without first obtaining the consent of the director of corrections, or who shall convey from the institutions any article without the consent of the director of corrections, shall be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed to any prisoner any drugs, tobacco or any article that could be used as a weapon, without first obtaining the consent of the director of corrections, may be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

For the purposes of subsection (b), “prisoner” includes all persons committed to the adult correctional institution, in the custody of the warden, in the custody of any other officer while outside the confines of the custodial unit, in the custody of the state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-1

, regardless of whether that prisoner is held upon conviction or upon any criminal charge. “Prisoner” shall not include persons on home confinement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 170, § 1.

11-25-14.1.
Unlawful possession of telecommunications devices.

It shall be unlawful for any prisoner to possess any portable electronic communication device, including, but not limited to, cellular telephones, cloned cellular telephones, two-way radios, pagers, personal digital assistants, or any other device capable of transmitting or intercepting cellular or radio signals between providers and users of telecommunication and data services. Any violation of this provision shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), a prison term not to exceed five (5) years, or both.

For the purposes of this section, “prisoner” includes all persons incarcerated at the adult correctional institution, in the custody of any other officer while outside the confines of the custodial unit, or in the custody of the state director of behavioral health, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-1

. It shall not include those offenders on home confinement pursuant to §

42-56-20.2

, nor those offenders serving on parole.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 83, § 1.

11-25-15.
Imprisonment for failure to appear at a court ordered hearing.

This section shall apply to every person who has been or shall be detained at or in the adult correctional institutions for failure to appear at a court ordered ability to pay hearing. After that person has completed his or her detention for lack of bail for failure to appear at an ability to pay hearing, he or she shall receive a reduction in fines and fees owed to the court, if any, in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day served (or any fraction thereof) to be applied against the amount of his/her outstanding fines or costs, or both.

Provided further, any person detained at the adult correctional institution for failure to appear who also claims an inability to pay his or her fines or costs shall be entitled to an evidentiary hearing in the district court within forty-eight (48) hours of the detention on the issue of ability to pay. Should the forty-eight (48) hours fall on a weekend or holiday, the hearing shall be scheduled on the next available court date. If, after the hearing, it is determined there is no ability to pay, then that person shall immediately be released from detention. This section shall not deter or preclude any available alternatives to payment of the fines or costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9; P.L. 2006, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 367, § 1.

11-25-16.
Juvenile escapees.

Any person sixteen (16) years or older who shall escape from the Rhode Island training school for youth after having been placed in the institution by the order of a family court judge, or who shall escape from the adult correctional institutions after having been placed in the institution by an order of a family court judge, shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned for a term not exceeding two (2) years and/or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

In any case provided by subsection (a) of this section, the family court shall hold a hearing to determine whether or not the family court’s jurisdiction over the child shall be waived and may, if it so finds, order the child held for trial under the regular procedure of the district and/or superior courts.

If the family court elects to keep jurisdiction over the child, the court shall follow its regular procedure.

In the adjudication of any case under this section, the fact that the person has been found delinquent for the offense of escaping from the Rhode Island training school for youth on one or more occasions shall be prima facie evidence that the person cannot be rehabilitated under chapter 10 of title 8. The superintendent of the Rhode Island training school shall notify the department of attorney general, the Rhode Island state police, and the Cranston Police Department of any escape, or attempted escape from the Rhode Island training school.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9; P.L. 1994, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 183, § 1.

11-25-16.1.
Escape after certification.

Any person who violates the provisions of §

11-25-16

after having been certified and adjudicated by the family court pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

may, after a hearing by a justice of the family court to determine that probable cause exists to believe that the child has escaped from the institution, have the jurisdiction over his or her sentence transferred to the department of corrections to be served in facilities under the control of the department.

A finding pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall constitute presumptive evidence of the nonamenability of the person of further treatment in facilities available to the family court. The court shall transfer the jurisdiction over his or her sentence to the department of corrections to be served in facilities under the control of that department, unless the presumption is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence which demonstrates that the person is amenable to treatment in facilities available to the family court.

A finding pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall constitute presumptive evidence of the nonamenability of the person to further treatment in facilities available to the family court and the court shall waive jurisdiction over the offense and all subsequent offenses. The child shall be prosecuted for those offenses by the court which would have jurisdiction if committed by an adult, unless the presumption is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence which demonstrates that the person is amenable to treatment in the facilities available to the family court.

A waiver of jurisdiction over a child pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall constitute a waiver of jurisdiction over the child for that offense, as well as for all subsequent offenses of whatever nature. The child shall be referred to the court which would have had jurisdiction if the offense had been committed by an adult.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 4.

11-25-17.
Receipt, safekeeping and record of prisoners.

The director of corrections shall receive into his or her custody and safely keep in the institutions every person who shall be committed to the adult correctional institutions until the prisoner shall be legally discharged. The liability of the committing officer shall cease and the liabilities of the director of corrections shall commence immediately upon the entering and signing of the commitment by the committing officer in the book of those institutions kept for that purpose. The director shall cause to be maintained a record in which shall be entered the reception, discharge, death, pardon or escape of every prisoner, all disciplinary action for breach of institution regulations, and all medical care received.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9.

11-25-18.
Receipt of gifts by employees of department of corrections.

No employee of the department of corrections shall receive from any prisoner confined in the adult correctional institutions, nor from anyone on behalf of such a prisoner, any reward or gift, or promise of any reward or gift, either for services or supplies or as a gratuity. Any employee in violation of this provision shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days and shall, upon final conviction, be immediately dismissed from employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9.

11-25-19.
Record of visitors.

A record of every visitor to any institution within the department of corrections including, but not limited to, the adult correction institutions, women’s division, adult correctional institutions, and training school for youth, shall be maintained and each visitor shall identify himself or herself and shall sign his or her proper legal name. Any person who shall give false information for that record shall be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9.

11-25-20.
Habeas corpus for production of prisoner.

Whenever a writ of habeas corpus shall issue from either the supreme or superior court for the production and appearance before it of a prisoner confined in the adult correctional institutions, the writ shall be delivered to the division of sheriffs. Whenever the writ is issued from any other court, it shall be delivered to the division of sheriffs or to any town sergeant or chief of police or police constable, who shall duly present it to the director of corrections of the institutions. The director of corrections shall upon receipt of the writ deliver the prisoner to the custody of the officer. The officer shall take and receive the prisoner into his or her custody, shall duly present the prisoner before the court pursuant to the command of the writ, and shall keep and hold the prisoner until by order of the court he or she shall be recommitted to the institutions or otherwise disposed of. Upon the delivery of the custody of the prisoner by the director of corrections to the officer, the director of corrections shall endorse the delivery upon the writ, and the officer shall receipt on the books of the institutions for custody. The officer, upon the production of the prisoner in court, shall further endorse that fact on the writ and deliver it to the clerk or (if there is no clerk) the presiding justice; but shall, as an officer of the court, maintain safe custody of the prisoner until he or she is, by further order, recommitted or discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 34.

11-25-21.
Habeas corpus — Training school for youth.

Whenever a writ of habeas corpus shall issue from either the supreme, superior or family court for the production and appearance before it of a prisoner confined in the training school for youth, the writ shall be delivered to the division of sheriffs. Whenever the writ is issued from any other court, it shall be delivered to the division of sheriffs or to any town sergeant or chief of police or police constable who shall duly present it to the superintendent of the training school for youth. The superintendent shall upon receipt of the writ deliver the prisoner to the custody of the officer. The officer shall take and receive the prisoner into his or her custody, shall duly present him or her before the court pursuant to the commands of the writ, and shall keep and hold the prisoner until by order of the court the prisoner shall be recommitted to the institution or otherwise disposed of. Upon the delivery of the custody of the prisoner by the superintendent to the officer, the superintendent shall endorse the delivery upon the writ, and the officer shall receipt on the books of the training school for youth for the custody. The officer, upon the production of the prisoner in court, shall further endorse that fact on the writ and deliver it to the clerk or (if there is no clerk) the presiding justice; but shall, as an officer of the court, maintain safe custody of the prisoner until he or she is, by further order, recommitted or discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 9; P.L. 1977, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 34.

11-25-22.
Escape from custody.

Any person who shall attempt to escape, or who shall escape, from any lawful custody where a penalty is not otherwise provided by law, shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 116, § 1.

11-25-23.
Allowing prisoners to have controlled substances.

Every person who shall voluntarily permit any prisoner to unlawfully have access to any controlled substances as defined in §

21-28-1.02

shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

For the purposes of this section, “prisoner” includes all persons committed to the adult correctional institutions, in the custody of the warden, in the custody of any other officer while outside the confines of the custodial unit, in the custody of the state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-5.3-1

, or the Rhode Island training school for youth, regardless of whether that prisoner is held upon conviction or upon any criminal charge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 393, § 1.

11-25-24.
Correctional employees — Sexual relations with inmates — Felony.

Every employee of the department of corrections or the employee of a contractor who is under contract to provide services in a correctional institution who engages in sexual penetration as defined in §

11-37-1

with an inmate confined in a correction institution or who is otherwise under the direct custodial supervision and control of that employee shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 119, § 1.